Utah statutes.
70A-9a-803.   Security interest unperfected before effective date.

A security interest that is an unperfected security interest immediately before Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 215 takes effect becomes a perfected security interest:

(1)  without further action, when Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 215 takes effect if the applicable requirements for perfection under this chapter as amended by Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 215 are satisfied before or at that time; or

(2)  when the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.



Enacted by Chapter 225, 2013 General Session 

Enacted by Chapter 225, 2013 General Session

